Oklahoma, session 2025, SB196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Water


Resources Board from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the


General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2023, the sum of One Million Two Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($1,200,000.00) for the purpose of providing infrastructure


grants to rural water districts of this state.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-237 RD 12/30/2024 2:35:04 PM



Req. No. 237 Page 1